Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB750.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 107(a) of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.805, No.247), known as the Pennsylvania Municipalities Planning Code, is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 107. Definitions.--(a) The following words and 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829 phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Distribution center," a specialized facility within the supply chain management system that serves as a central point for receiving, storing, managing and distributing goods to various destinations. The term does not include a facility that is open to the public for retail sales.* * *"High impact warehouse or distribution center," a proposed development of regional significance and impact that is a warehouse or a distribution center that uses at least three acres and is 100,000 square feet or greater.* * *"Warehouse," a large, organized space or facility used for the systematic storage, retrieval and movement of various goods, materials, merchandise and other items. The term does not include a facility that is open to the public for retail sales.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 508.2. Local Option for High Impact Warehouses and Distribution Centers.--(a) A decision of a governing body or the planning agency under section 508 that approves an application for a plat containing a high impact warehouse or distribution center is not final unless the electorate of the municipality through a local option at an election approve the proposed high impact warehouse or distribution center in accordance with this section.(b) An election under this section shall be held on the date 20250HB0750PN0750 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of the next election which occurs at least 100 days after a decision of a governing body or planning agency under subsection (a), to determine the will of the electors with respect to approval of the proposed high impact warehouse or distribution center within the limits of the municipality under the provisions of this act.(c) When the governing body of the municipality adopts, by a majority vote, a resolution to place a question on the ballot and files a copy of the resolution with the board of elections of the county for a referendum on the question of approving a specific high impact warehouse or distribution center, the county board of elections shall place a question on the ballot or on the voting machine board and submit the question to the electors at the applicable election.(d) On the ballot and immediately preceding the question shall appear a sentence describing the details of the proposed high impact warehouse or distribution center use such as the total acreage, the proposed building size and any proposed road and street improvements. The question shall be in the following form:Do you approve of (name of municipality) approving the high impact warehouse or distribution center at (location) whose application was submitted on (month) of (year)?(e) If a majority of the electors voting on the question vote "yes," the application filed under section 508 is finally approved in the municipality, but if a majority of the electors voting on the question vote "no," the application for the proposed high impact warehouse or distribution center is denied.(f) Except as otherwise provided in this section, proceedings under this section shall be in accordance with the 20250HB0750PN0750 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provisions of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the "Pennsylvania Election Code."Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0750PN0750 - 4 - 123